inc/V-CLASS_AANG_gt-norm.yaml
     ñínyaang+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñínyaang
     ñínyaang+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaangga
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang
     ñínyaang+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaanggang
     ñínyaang+V+DIRECT+PAST: ñínyaanggan
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñínyaangaan
     ñínyaang+V+RELATIVE: ñínyaangs
     ñínyaang+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñínyaangaas
     ñínyaang+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaangang
     ñínyaang+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaangaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang
     ñínyaang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaangganggang
     ñínyaang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaanggangang
     ñínyaang+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaangaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaangaangaan
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñínyaangäsaa
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñínyaangäs
     ñínyaang+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñínyaangäsaang
     ñínyaang+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñínyaangäsga
     ñínyaang+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaangäsaas
     ñínyaang+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaangäsaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasa'áa
     ñínyaang+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasa'áang
     ñínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaasdláa
     ñínyaang+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaasdláang
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'uuj
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñínyaangäsaa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'us
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'ujaa
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'uujaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaangäsaa'us
     ñínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñínyaang'ahlanggan
     ñínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ahlanggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñínyaangäsaa'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñínyaangaa'ahlang
     ñínyaang+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñínyaangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñínyaang+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñínyaangaa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+REFLEXIVE: ñínyaang'ahl
     ñínyaang+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñínyaangäseehl
     ñínyaang+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñínyaang'uu
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'wägan
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'aawaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'aawaan
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'waas
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñínyaang'aawaas
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'waa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'aawaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang'waang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaanggang'waa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'wägiinii
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'wägaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'wägaangaan
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñínyaang'waaäsaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñínyaang'waaäs
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waaäsaang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waaäsga
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waaäsaas
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa'uuj
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñínyaang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa'us
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'waa'ujaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waaäsaa'us
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñínyaang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñínyaang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'waa'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñínyaang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñínyaang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñínyaang'waa'ahl
     ñínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñínyaang'waaäseehl
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñínyaang'ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'angga
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'anggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'anggan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'aangaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'aangaan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'ans
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñínyaang'aangaas
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'angang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'aangaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'anggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang'anggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaanggang'angang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'anggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'anggaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'anggaangaan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñínyaang'angäsaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñínyaang'angäs
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'angäsaang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'angäsga
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'angäsaas
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'angäsaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaa'áng
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaangang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'uuj
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñínyaang'angäsaa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'us
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'ujaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'uujaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'angäsaa'us
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñínyaang'aang'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ñínyaang'aang'ahlanggan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñínyaang'angäsaa'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'aang'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'aangaa'ahlang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñínyaang'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñínyaang'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ñínyaang'aang'ahl
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñínyaang'angäseehl
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñínyaang'ang'uu
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'wägan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'aawaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'aawaan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waas
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñínyaang'ang'aawaas
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'ang'aawaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang'ang'waa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínyaanggang'ang'waang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaanggang'ang'waa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'wägiinii
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'wägaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'wägaangaan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñínyaang'ang'waaäs
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsga
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaas
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñínyaang'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa'uuj
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa'us
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ujaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ahlans
